Wyoming, session 2026, SF0037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G)(II) and
21-15-109(c)(iii)(C) are amended to read:

21-13-309. Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.

SF0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0087
(m) In determining the amount to be included in the
foundation program for each district, the state
superintendent shall:

(v) Based upon ADM computations and identified
school configurations within each district pursuant to
paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation
program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming
legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as
contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports
referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the
administration of the education resource block grant model:

(G) Amounts within the block grant model
for maintenance and operations shall be based upon actual
gross square footage of school buildings and facilities
subject to the following:

(II) Actual gross square footage of
education space shall be the gross square footage
prescribed by statewide building adequacy standards
SF0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0087
promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-15-115. Except as otherwise
provided in this subdivision, Education space capacity in
excess of one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the
standard space level shall not be included in actual gross
square footage computations under this subdivision. For
school year 2025-2026, education space capacity in excess
of one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the standard
space level shall not be included in actual gross square
footage computations under this subdivision;

21-15-109. Major building and facility repair and
replacement payments; computation; square footage
allowance; use of payment funds; accounting and reporting
requirements.

(c) To compute the major building and facility repair
and replacement payment for each district, the department
shall:

(iii) Except as otherwise provided by this
paragraph, adjust the total amount of gross square footage
determined for educational buildings under subparagraph
(c)(ii)(C) of this section by excluding from computations
SF0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0087
under this section the square footage for those educational
buildings closed and not operational as provided for under
paragraph (c)(iv) of this section and any amount including
the gross square footage of portable buildings, which
exceeds capacity levels specified by this paragraph which
are above the statewide minimum gross square footage
criteria as prescribed by the statewide building and
facility adequacy standards promulgated under W.S.
21-15-115(a). For the purpose of adjusting the gross square
footage of educational buildings under this paragraph, the
gross square footage of buildings used for the provision of
certified child care, developmental preschool and
cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph
(c)(i)(A) of this section shall not be excluded. For
purposes of this section, per student gross square footage
criteria prescribed by the statewide building adequacy
standards shall be based upon an average daily membership
(ADM) computed as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) for
the prior school year. For purposes of computations under
this section, the allowable capacity in educational
building gross square footage for each district including
portable buildings, but excluding buildings used for the
provision of certified child care, developmental preschool
SF0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0087
and cooperative education programs pursuant to subparagraph
(c)(i)(A) of this section, shall be as follows:

(C) Except as otherwise provided in this
subparagraph, For each school year, up to one hundred
fifteen percent (115%) of the prescribed per student gross
square footage criteria. For school year 2025-2026, up to
one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the prescribed
per student gross square footage criteria.

Section 2.

(a) There is appropriated thirty-one million nine
hundred thousand dollars ($31,900,000.00) from the public
school foundation program account to the state construction
department for major maintenance payments to school
districts made necessary by the amendments enacted in
section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.
SF0037

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0087

(b) There is appropriated eleven million eight
hundred thousand dollars ($11,800,000.00) from the public
school foundation program account to the department of
education-school finance for routine maintenance payments
to school districts made necessary by the amendments
enacted in section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall
be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June
30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0037